Washington statutes.
RCW 43.59.180

Negligent driving with a vulnerable user victim—First degree—Information and education. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the Washington traffic safety commission shall produce and disseminate through all possible media, informational and educational materials explaining the penalties of the crime of negligent driving with a vulnerable user victim in the first degree.

[ 2023 c 471 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 471: See note following RCW 46.61.5259.